Georgia, session 2025_26, HB302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Leave No Georgia Child Hungry Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elementary and
secondary education, is amended in Part 5 of Article 6, relating to program weights and
funding requirements, by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-187.1.
(a)(1) The State Board of Education shall annually determine the amount of state funds
needed to provide a state-wide program to offer quality and healthy meals, without
H. B. 302
- 1 -

LC 61 0092
charge, to all students enrolled in a public school in this state who are enrolled in
after-school education programs or summer school education programs. State funds
appropriated for this purpose shall be used to supplement federal funds, if any.
(2) The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations which:
(A) Establish minimum nutritional requirements for after-school meal programs and
summer school meal programs which meet or exceed the minimum federal regulations;
(B) Provide that each participating local school system submit a plan of compliance;
and
(C) Assist local school systems in applying for and obtaining start-up grant money for
such programs.
(b) Each local school system is encouraged to establish and support a program to offer
quality and healthy meals, without charge, to all students enrolled in a public school in this
state who are enrolled in after-school education programs or summer school education
programs. Each local education school system operating such a program shall be
reimbursed by the state according to policies, rules, and regulations established by the State
Board of Education and subject to appropriations for such purposes by the General
Assembly."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 302
- 2 -